District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-934

Annual report of association; contents; penalty for false statement.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 488, ch. 397, § 34
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 448(a), 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, §§ 2(s)(1), 26(a), 38 DCR 314
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-934.
1981 Ed., § 29-1134.
1973 Ed., § 29-834.

Prior Codifications